Rhode Island, session 2025, HB5602.
It is enacted by the General Assembly as follows:
SECTION 1. Section 16-11-1 of the General Laws in Chapter 16-11 entitled "Certification
of Teachers [See Title 16 Chapter 97 — The Rhode Island Board of Education Act]" is hereby
amended to read as follows:
16-11-1. Certification of public school teachers required — Deductions from state aid
for noncompliance.
No person shall be employed to teach, as principal or assistant, in any school supported
wholly or in part by public money unless the person shall have a certificate of qualification issued
by or under the authority of the board of regents for elementary and secondary education. Provided,
however, that any person who is employed as a part time speech and language pathologist at the
Rhode Island School for the Deaf, for a period of not less than ten (10) years prior to July 11, 1990,
shall not be required to have a certificate of qualification, and shall be exempt from the provisions
of this section which require the certificate. Provided, further, however, that any person who is
employed as a physical education teacher shall not by required to have a certification in adaptive
physical education, unless they were hired after July 1, 2025. In case any city or town shall pay or
cause to be paid any of the public money to any person for teaching who did not, at the time of
teaching, hold a certificate, then the department of elementary and secondary education shall deduct
a sum equal to the amount so paid from the amount of the state’s money due, or which may
thereafter become due, to the city or town, before giving his or her order in favor of the city or town
for any of the public money under the provisions of §§ 16-1-10, 16-1-11, and 16-5-22.

SECTION 2. This act shall take effect upon passage.
========
LC001725
========
LC001725 - Page 2 of 3